Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 6 Retirement Benefits and Death Benefits

47-16-100.
Eligibility for retirement benefits.

In order for a member to be eligible to receive retirement benefits under this chapter, he must meet the following requirements:

The member must have served a minimum of at least four years as a qualified and commissioned sheriff of a county in the State of Georgia during which time the member served as sheriff of the superior court of that county after and including January 1, 1961; provided, however, as applied to any person first or again becoming a sheriff and a member on or after July 1, 1988, the member must have served a minimum of at least eight years as a qualified and commissioned sheriff of a county as provided in this paragraph;

The member must have paid dues as required by this chapter;

He must have reached the age of 55 years, provided that any member who is otherwise eligible to receive retirement benefits except for his having reached the age of 60 years shall, from and after April 1, 1973, be eligible to receive retirement benefits upon reaching the age of 55 years, even though he may have ceased to hold the office of sheriff;

He must have terminated his official capacity and service as a sheriff;

He must have filed and received approval of such application for retirement benefits as may be required by the board. The application shall be filed with the secretary-treasurer within a period of 90 days, or as soon thereafter as possible, after reaching 55 years of age or after termination of his official capacity and service as a sheriff, whichever is the latter date; and

He must have fully complied with all mandatory provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted by the board.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 17; Ga. L. 1972, p. 705, §§ 1, 3; Ga. L. 1973, p. 892, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 4; Ga. L. 1988, p. 352, § 2; Ga. L. 1990, p. 315, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 325, § 3.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Administrative Rules, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Sheriffs’ Retirement Fund of Georgia, Chapter 513-13-2.

47-16-101.
Retirement benefit options; failure of member to select an option; effect of changes in retirement benefits and options; change of option after receipt of payments.

At the time a member becomes eligible for retirement benefits, he or she shall choose one of three payment options for retirement benefits. The member must indicate his or her choice of payment options upon the application for retirement benefits filed with the secretary-treasurer. Upon approval of the member’s application by the board, such member shall be paid retirement benefits in the form of a monthly sum of money determined in accordance with the option he or she has selected. The three payment options are as follows:

Option One shall be known as a “single life annuity” and shall provide retirement benefits for the life of the member only. If the member has no more than four years of service credited to such member under this chapter, the member shall be paid a benefit of $380.00 per month until the member’s death. If the member has more than four years credited to such member under the provisions of this chapter, such member shall be paid a benefit of $380.00 per month, plus $95.00 per month for each additional year of service so credited to the member. If the member has additional service credit not totaling a full year, the further sum of one-twelfth of the amount paid per month for each additional year of service credit over four years shall be paid for each month of additional service so credited to the member; provided, however, that in no case shall such benefits exceed $2,850.00 per month; provided, further, that the board of commissioners shall be authorized to increase such benefits by an amount not to exceed 3 percent per annum based on the following factors:

The recommendation of the actuary of the board of commissioners;

The maintenance of the actuarial soundness of the fund in accordance with the standards provided in Code Section 47-20-10 or such higher standards as may be adopted by the board; and

Such other factors as the board deems relevant.

Any such increase may be uniform or may vary in accordance with the time of retirement, length of service, age, nature of the retirement, or such other factors as the board of commissioners shall determine; provided, however, that no such increase shall be made to become effective within six months of the effective date of any increase in the maximum retirement benefit granted by the General Assembly through amendment of this Code section;

Option Two shall be known as a “100 percent joint life annuity” and shall provide retirement benefits for the life of either the member or his or her spouse, whichever is the survivor. The monthly amount to be paid under this option shall be based on the member’s age and that of his or her spouse at the member’s retirement and shall be the actuarial equivalent of the monthly retirement payment which would have been paid to the member under Option One. Actuarial equivalents shall be computed using a current and accurate mortality table adopted by the board; and

Option Three shall be known as the “50 percent contingency life annuity” and shall provide for payment of a 50 percent benefit for the life of the surviving spouse. The amount to be paid under this option shall be based on the member’s age and that of his or her spouse at the member’s retirement and shall be computed so as to be actuarially equivalent to the monthly benefit which would have been paid to the member under Option One. Actuarial equivalents shall be computed using a current and accurate mortality table adopted by the board. When a retired member has elected Option Two or Option Three, in the event the spouse predeceases the retired member, the monthly retirement benefit payable to the retired member after the death of the spouse shall be increased to the monthly retirement benefit which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under Option One. In the event any such retired member remarries or has remarried after the death of the former spouse, the retired member may elect to begin receiving the applicable reduced retirement benefit of equivalent actuarial value and reestablish on behalf of the new spouse the same option which was applicable to the deceased former spouse, but such option on behalf of the new spouse may not be reestablished until one year after the date of remarriage or until a child of the remarried couple is born, whichever is earlier. Such actuarial equivalence shall be based on the age of the retired member and the age of the retired member’s new spouse at the time of such election and shall be computed on the Mortality Table GA51, with projection, using interest at 6 percent per annum, with a five-year age setback for females and monthly payment annuity functions.

Benefits payable to the spouse of a deceased member shall be payable for only so long as such spouse remains the widow or widower of such deceased member and, should such spouse remarry, any benefits payable to such spouse shall cease as of the date of remarriage.

At any time after the entry of a final judgment of divorce, a retired member receiving benefits under either Option Two or Option Three may continue receiving benefits under the option so chosen for the benefit of the former spouse or may revoke the election. In the event the retired member revokes the election, the retired member shall begin receiving the monthly retirement benefit which the retired member would have been entitled to receive under Option One. Benefits paid under Option One to a retired member following such revocation shall not be retroactive. In the event that the retired member remarries after divorce from the former spouse and the member elected to revoke Option Two or Option Three as provided in this paragraph, the retired member may elect to begin receiving reduced monthly retirement benefits of actuarial equivalence under either Option Two or Option Three. Such actuarial equivalence shall be based on the age of the retired member and the age of the retired member’s new spouse at the time of such election and shall be computed on the Mortality Table GA5 1, with projection, using interest at 6 percent per annum, with a five-year age setback for females and monthly payment annuity functions.

Any provisions of this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, $20.00 shall be deducted from the monthly retirement benefits of the member or the monthly retirement benefits under Option Two or Three to the spouse of the member when the member has been credited with any period of service under this chapter which was performed prior to January 1, 1961, and for which dues shall not have been paid by the member, until a total sum of $20.00 for every month of service prior to January 1, 1961, so credited to the member shall have been withheld, or until dues have been paid or withheld for a maximum of 25 years, or until the death of the member and his or her spouse who is receiving benefits, whichever may occur first.

In the event any member with a spouse then living is unable to choose one of the three option payments, to complete and file an application for retirement benefits with the secretary-treasurer, or to obtain the approval of the board because of his or her death, mental incompetency, or other providential cause, but the member is otherwise eligible to receive retirement benefits except for his or her having been prevented, Option Two shall be effective, and retirement benefits shall be paid in accordance with that option.

The options under this Code section and the increase in the amounts to be paid as retirement benefits pursuant to said options shall become effective and apply from and after May 1, 1979. Those members and persons already receiving retirement benefits which were computed and determined at a time when the options were not available shall not be afforded an opportunity to select an option but shall have their retirement benefits recomputed and determined in accordance with the provisions of Option One, and the increase in benefits shall be paid to such members or persons from and after May 1, 1979. For those members or persons eligible to receive retirement benefits from and after May 1, 1979, their service shall be computed and determined in accordance with the increased retirement benefits in this Code section in accordance with the member’s option selected in accordance with the provisions of this Code section and according to the number of years of creditable service credited to such member or person under this Code section, and such member shall be paid the retirement benefits so determined from and after May 1, 1979. For those members or persons already receiving retirement benefits, such members or persons shall be entitled to have their retirement benefits recomputed and determined in accordance with this Code section, and the increase in benefits according to their years of creditable service shall be paid to such members and persons from and after May 1, 1979.

No member shall be allowed to change the retirement options provided in this Code section subsequent to the time that such member receives the first payment under the retirement option originally selected by such member.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 18; Ga. L. 1972, p. 705, § 4; Ga. L. 1973, p. 1414, § 1; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1194, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 332, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1291, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1690, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1979, p. 994, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1853, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1889, § 2; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 5; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1348, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 604, § 2; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1566, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1990, p. 553, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 130, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 608, § 2; Ga. L. 1994, p. 92, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 325, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 789, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 375, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 155, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1167, § 2; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, §§ 64, 66/SB 436; Ga. L. 2012, p. 675, § 1/HB 337.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, substituted “board of commissioners” for “board of trustees” in the last sentence of paragraph (a)(1), at the end of subparagraph (a)(1)(A), and in the last undesignated paragraph of subsection (a); and substituted “member and,” for “member and” near the end of subsection (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, designated the existing provisions of subsection (b) as paragraph (b)(1); and added paragraph (b)(2).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-16-102.
Death benefits; beneficiaries; procedure for designation of beneficiary to receive such benefits.

In addition to the retirement benefits provided in this chapter, death benefits shall be paid to members in accordance with the following:

If any member of this fund dies before retirement, whether such member is active or inactive, an amount equal to the total amount which has been paid by such member into the fund as dues shall be paid, without interest, to such member’s surviving spouse, if any, to such member’s named beneficiary, if any, or to such member’s estate, in that order. If any member dies after retirement without having received an amount equal in benefits to the total amount which he has paid into the fund as dues, the difference, without interest, shall be paid to his surviving spouse, if any, to his named beneficiary, if any, or to such member’s estate, in that order;

In addition to the death benefits provided in paragraph (1) of this Code section, upon the death of any inactive member who would otherwise qualify to be carried upon the active membership rolls but for the fact that the member no longer holds the office of sheriff, any member who is receiving retirement benefits, or any member who is otherwise qualified to receive retirement benefits from this fund except that the member has not reached the age of 55 years or has not filed an application or has not been approved for retirement benefits, the sum of $15,000.00 shall be paid as additional death benefits to the surviving spouse of such member, if any, to the member’s named beneficiary, if any, or to the member’s estate, in that order. Upon the death of any active member, the sum of $15,000.00 shall be paid as additional death benefits to the surviving spouse of such member, if any, to the member’s named beneficiary, if any, or to the member’s estate, in that order;

At the time any member submits his application for membership in this fund, at the time any member submits his application for retirement benefits, and from time to time any member of this fund, whether carried on the active or inactive rolls of this fund, and any person who is receiving retirement benefits from this fund shall be afforded the opportunity to name a designated beneficiary to receive the death benefits provided for in this Code section; provided, however, such named beneficiary shall be entitled to receive such death benefits only in the event such member or person does not leave surviving a spouse at the time of his death. The procedure by which a member or person receiving retirement benefits names a beneficiary to receive the death benefits provided for in this Code section shall be determined and established by the board, which shall have authority to establish forms and procedures for payment of the death benefits; and

Upon the death of an active member before or after the retirement of such member, the surviving spouse of such member shall receive death benefits in the form of an annuity for the life of such spouse, such annuity to be determined and paid under paragraph (2) of subsection (a), subsection (b), and subsection (c) of Code Section 47-16-101 to the same extent as if such member had died while receiving retirement benefits under Option Two; and in the case of the death of an active member who is not already receiving retirement benefits, such annuity shall be determined and based upon the period of creditable service which such member has at the time of his death. Such benefit shall be in addition to benefits under paragraph (2) of this Code section, and in lieu of benefits under paragraph (1) of this Code section.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 19; Ga. L. 1974, p. 1191, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 904, § 1; Ga. L. 1980, p. 768, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 1853, § 2; Ga. L. 1981, p. 694, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1185, § 6; Ga. L. 1985, p. 209, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 607, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 325, § 5; Ga. L. 2008, p. 132, § 1/HB 358; Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 64/SB 436.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, substituted “$15,000.00” for “$7,000.00” twice in paragraph (2).

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, added “and” at the end of paragraph (3).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “The intent of this Act is to repeal obsolete and inoperative provisions and to make certain stylistic corrections in Title 47 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated. Nothing in this Act shall deny, abridge, increase, renew, revive, or on any way affect any right, benefit, option, credit, or election to which any person was entitled pursuant to such title on June 30, 2010, and the board of trustees of each public retirement system is authorized and directed to provide by regulation for the continuation of any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election not otherwise covered in this Act; provided, however, that any such right, benefit, option, credit, or election shall be subject to the statutory provisions in effect on June 30, 2010.”

Ga. L. 2010, p. 1207, § 67, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “In the event of an irreconcilable conflict between a provision of Sections 62 through 64 of this Act and a provision of another Act enacted at the 2010 regular session of the General Assembly, the provision of such other Act shall control over this Act to the extent of the conflict.”

47-16-103.
Right to withdraw dues; effect of withdrawal on membership and benefits.

Any member may withdraw the total sum which he has paid into the fund as membership dues at any time before retirement or before he begins to draw retirement benefits. No interest shall be paid on amounts so withdrawn.

Membership shall cease upon withdrawal of dues under subsection (a) of this Code section. No person who so withdraws his dues shall be eligible to again become a member or to receive any benefits under this chapter, provided that any prior member who, before January 1, 1982, has withdrawn the total sums which he has paid into the fund may be reinstated as a member by meeting the following requirements:

He may claim credit for all prior service as a sheriff by tendering payment of all dues which he would have paid had he been a member of the fund, together with interest on such amount at 8 percent per annum and such reasonable penalty as may be imposed by the board, provided that in no event shall any sheriff who rejoins the fund under this subsection be permitted to claim credit for any prior service as a peace officer, except sheriff, or as a member of the armed forces of the United States; and

The application for reinstatement is filed with the secretary-treasurer on or before June 30, 1982.

History.

Ga. L. 1963, p. 630, § 15; Ga. L. 1975, p. 823, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 1607, §§ 1, 2.